Illinois, session 104th, SB1585.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 4-108.6 and 6-227 and by adding Sections 64-108.9 and 6-227.2 as follows: 7    (40 ILCS 5/4-108.6)8    Sec. 4-108.6. Transfer of creditable service to the 9Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago. 10    (a) Until 6 months after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly the effective 12date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, any 13active member of the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of 14Chicago may apply for transfer of up to 10 years of creditable 15service accumulated in any pension fund established under this 16Article to the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago. 17Such creditable service shall be transferred only upon payment 18by such pension fund to the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund 19of Chicago of an amount equal to:20        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 21    applicant on the books of the fund on the date of transfer;22        (2) employer contributions in an amount equal to the 23    amount determined under subparagraph (1); and  SB1585- 2 -LRB104 07400 RPS 17441 b1        (3) any interest paid by the applicant in order to 2    reinstate service.3    Participation in such pension fund as to any credits 4transferred under this Section shall terminate on the date of 5transfer.6    (b) An active member of the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit 7Fund of Chicago applying for a transfer of creditable service 8under subsection (a) may reinstate credits and creditable 9service terminated upon receipt of a refund by payment to the 10Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago of the amount of 11the refund with interest thereon at the actuarially assumed 12rate, compounded annually, from the date of the refund to the 13date of payment. 14(Source: P.A. 100-544, eff. 11-8-17.) 15    (40 ILCS 5/4-108.9 new)16    Sec. 4-108.9. Transfer of creditable service from the 17Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago. Until 6 months 18after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 19General Assembly, any active participant in a fund established 20under this Article may transfer to that fund creditable 21service accumulated under Article 6 of this Code upon payment 22to the Article 4 fund, within 5 years after the date of 23application, of an amount equal to the difference between the 24amount of employee and employer contributions transferred to 25the Article 4 fund under Section 6-227.2 and the amounts   SB1585- 3 -LRB104 07400 RPS 17441 b1determined by the Article 4 fund in accordance with this 2Section, plus interest on that difference at the actuarially 3assumed rate, compounded annually, from the date of service to 4the date of payment.5    The Article 4 fund must determine the firefighter's 6payment required to establish creditable service under this 7Section by taking into account the appropriate actuarial 8assumptions, including without limitation the firefighter's 9service, age, and salary history; the level of funding of the 10Article 4 fund; and any other factors that the Article 4 fund 11determines to be relevant. For this purpose, the firefighter's 12required payment should result in no significant increase to 13the Article 4 fund's unfunded actuarial accrued liability 14determined as of the most recent actuarial valuation, based on 15the same assumptions and methods used to develop and report 16the Article 4 fund's actuarial accrued liability and actuarial 17value of assets under Statement No. 25 of Governmental 18Accounting Standards Board or any subsequent applicable 19Statement.  20    (40 ILCS 5/6-227)21    Sec. 6-227. Transfer of creditable service from Article 4. 22Until 6 months after the effective date of this amendatory Act 23of the 104th General Assembly the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, any active 25member of the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago   SB1585- 4 -LRB104 07400 RPS 17441 b1may transfer to the Fund up to a total of 10 years of 2creditable service accumulated under Article 4 of this Code 3upon payment to the Fund within 5 years after the date of 4application of an amount equal to the difference between the 5amount of employee and employer contributions transferred to 6the Fund under Section 4-108.6 and the amounts determined by 7the Fund in accordance with this Section, plus interest on 8that difference at the actuarially assumed rate, compounded 9annually, from the date of service to the date of payment.10    The Fund must determine the fireman's payment required to 11establish creditable service under this Section by taking into 12account the appropriate actuarial assumptions, including 13without limitation the fireman's service, age, and salary 14history; the level of funding of the Fund; and any other 15factors that the Fund determines to be relevant. For this 16purpose, the fireman's required payment should result in no 17significant increase to the Fund's unfunded actuarial accrued 18liability determined as of the most recent actuarial 19valuation, based on the same assumptions and methods used to 20develop and report the Fund's actuarial accrued liability and 21actuarial value of assets under Statement No. 25 of 22Governmental Accounting Standards Board or any subsequent 23applicable Statement.24(Source: P.A. 100-544, eff. 11-8-17.) 25    (40 ILCS 5/6-227.2 new)  SB1585- 5 -LRB104 07400 RPS 17441 b1    Sec. 6-227.2. Transfer of creditable service to Article 4. 2    (a) Until 6 months after the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, any active 4participant in an Article 4 pension fund may apply for 5transfer of creditable service accumulated in the Firemen's 6Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago to any Article 4 pension 7fund. Such creditable service shall be transferred only upon 8payment by the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of Chicago 9to the Article 4 fund of an amount equal to:10        (1) the amounts accumulated to the credit of the 11    applicant on the books of the fund on the date of transfer; 12        (2) employer contributions in an amount equal to the 13    amount determined under subparagraph (1); and 14        (3) any interest paid by the applicant in order to 15    reinstate service. 16    Participation in the Firemen's Annuity and Benefit Fund of 17Chicago as to any credits transferred under this Section shall 18terminate on the date of transfer. 19    (b) An active participant in an Article 4 pension fund 20applying for a transfer of creditable service under subsection 21(a) may reinstate credits and creditable service terminated 22upon receipt of a refund by payment to the Article 4 pension 23fund of the amount of the refund with interest thereon at the 24actuarially assumed rate, compounded annually, from the date 25of the refund to the date of payment.    SB1585- 6 -LRB104 07400 RPS 17441 b1    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 2Section 8.49 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)4    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 58 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 6the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.